lexica/numerals_overrides.lexc
LEXICON Numeral

dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Dual+Nom:dva #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Dual+Gen:dveh #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Dual+Dat:dvema #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Dual+Acc:dva #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Dual+Loc:dveh #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Dual+Ins:dvema #;

dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Dual+Nom:dve #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Dual+Gen:dveh #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Dual+Dat:dvema #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Dual+Acc:dve #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Dual+Loc:dveh #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Dual+Ins:dvema #;

dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Dual+Nom:dve #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Dual+Gen:dveh #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Dual+Dat:dvema #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Dual+Acc:dve #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Dual+Loc:dveh #;
dva+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Dual+Ins:dvema #;

trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Nom:trije #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Gen:treh #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Dat:trem #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Acc:tri #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Loc:treh #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Ins:tremi #;

trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Nom:tri #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Gen:treh #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Dat:trem #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Acc:tri #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Loc:treh #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Ins:tremi #;

trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Nom:tri #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Gen:treh #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Dat:trem #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Acc:tri #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Loc:treh #;
trije+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Ins:tremi #;

štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Nom:štirje #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Gen:štirih #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Dat:štirim #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Acc:štiri #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Loc:štirih #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Ins:štirimi #;

štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Nom:štiri #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Gen:štirih #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Dat:štirim #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Acc:štiri #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Loc:štirih #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Ins:štirimi #;

štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Nom:štiri #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Gen:štirih #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Dat:štirim #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Acc:štiri #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Loc:štirih #;
štirje+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Ins:štirimi #;

več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Nom:več #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Gen:večih #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Dat:večim #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Acc:več #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Loc:večih #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Masc+Plural+Ins:večimi #;

več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Nom:več #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Gen:večih #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Dat:večim #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Acc:več #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Loc:večih #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Fem+Plural+Ins:večimi #;

več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Nom:več #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Gen:večih #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Dat:večim #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Acc:več #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Loc:večih #;
več+Numeral+Letter+Cardinal+Neut+Plural+Ins:večimi #;

milijardti+Numeral+Letter+Ordinal+Neut+Sing+Nom:milijardte #;
milijardti+Numeral+Letter+Ordinal+Neut+Sing+Acc:milijardte #;
milijonti+Numeral+Letter+Ordinal+Neut+Sing+Nom:milijonte #;
milijonti+Numeral+Letter+Ordinal+Neut+Sing+Acc:milijonte #;
